Rhode Island, session 2025, SB662.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 16-45 of the General Laws entitled "Regional Vocational Schools
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by
adding thereto the following section:
16-45-12. Inter-district communication and accounting between sending or home
districts and receiving districts for CTE and pathways education programs.
(a) Effective July 1, 2025, for any student enrolled in, accepted to, or attending a state
career and technical education (“CTE”) board-approved program of choice or a pathways education
program, outside of the student's home district:
(1) Any school district or regional vocational school that receives a student from outside
of their district to provide and attend a career and technical education program of choice or a
pathways education program ( the “receiving district”), shall report back to the home district,
sometimes referred to in this chapter as the “sending district,” regarding the student’s status, on a
quarterly basis, or when a significant change in circumstances has occurred, including when a
student is no longer participating or matriculating in the CTE or pathways education program;
(2) In instances when the receiving district’s costs to provide those education services are
lower than the per pupil expenditure of the home district, the amount that the student’s home district
shall be responsible for shall be limited to that lower cost of the receiving district; and
(3) In regard to transportation costs, the student’s home district shall be required to pay
only the actual cost of transportation of the student to the receiving district, notwithstanding any

provisions to the contrary in chapter 21.1 of title 16 (“transportation of school pupils beyond city
and town limits”)
(b) The department of elementary and secondary education (the “department”) may
promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
========
LC002307
========
LC002307 - Page 2 of 3